Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1827
Authority; personnel.

The authority may employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, trustees, construction and finance experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and fix their compensation.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 27.